Hawaii statutes.
§92-82 Permitted interactions of
neighborhood board members. (a) Neighborhood board members may attend
meetings or presentations located on Oahu on matters relating to official board
business; provided that the meeting or presentation is open to the public, does
not charge a fee or require registration, and is not specifically and
exclusively organized for or directed toward members of the board; and provided
further that no member makes a commitment to vote on any of the issues
discussed.

(b) Neighborhood
board members who attend meetings or presentations allowed by subsection (a)
may ask questions relating to official board business of persons other than
fellow board members. [L 2008, c 153, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 91, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next